Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 2. Amendment of Bylaws

§ 10.20.
Amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws unless:

the articles of incorporation or this title reserve this power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or in part; or

the shareholders in amending or repealing a particular bylaw provide expressly that the board of directors may not amend or repeal that bylaw.

A corporation’s shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws even though the bylaws may also be amended or repealed by its board of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 10.21.
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for shareholders.

If authorized by the articles of incorporation, the shareholders may adopt or amend a bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of shareholders) than is required by this title. The adoption or amendment of a bylaw that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders under subsection (a) of this section may not be adopted, amended, or repealed by the board of directors.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 10.22.
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for directors.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended or repealed:

if originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders;

if originally adopted by the board of directors, either by the shareholders or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it may be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under subdivision (a)(2) of this section to adopt or amend a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.